District of Columbia statutes.
6-601.02

Nonfireproof business buildings.

No combustible or nonfireproof building in the District of Columbia used or occupied or intended to be used or occupied for business purposes only shall be erected, altered, or raised to a height of more than 60 feet above the sidewalk, and no combustible or nonfireproof building shall be converted to such use if it exceeds said height.

June 1, 1910, 36 Stat. 452, ch. 263, § 2
1981 Ed., § 5-402.
1973 Ed., § 5-402.